Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.200

Internal revenue code.

For purposes of the code:

(1) The legislature reserves the right at any time to alter or change the structure, organization, programs, or activities of the commission and to terminate the commission, so long as the action does not impair any outstanding contracts entered into by the commission;

(2) Any net earnings of the commission beyond that necessary to retire its bonds and to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall not inure to the benefit of any person other than the state;

(3) Upon dissolution of the commission, title to all of its remaining property shall vest in the state;

(4) The commission constitutes the only housing finance agency of the state of Washington; and

(5) In order to take advantage of the maximum amount of tax exempt bonds for housing financing available pursuant to the code, any state ceiling with respect to housing shall be allocated in accordance with the following formula:

(a) Eighty percent of the state ceiling shall be allocated to the commission and twenty percent shall be allocated to the other issuing authorities in the state.

(b) The allocation to the issuing authorities other than the commission shall be distributed to such issuing authorities in amounts as determined following public notice by the department of commerce pursuant to rules promulgated by it. The distribution shall be in response to applications received from such issuing authorities and shall be based on the following factors: (i) The amount of housing to be made available by such applicant; (ii) the population within the jurisdiction of the applicant; (iii) coordination with other applicable federal and state housing programs; (iv) the likelihood of implementing the proposed financing during that year; and (v) consistency with the plan of the commission. On or before February 1 of each year, the department of commerce shall distribute the state ceiling allocation among such issuing authorities and any unused portion shall be added to the allocation of the commission. Each issuing authority other than the commission shall confirm its allocation distribution by providing to the department of commerce no later than June 1 a copy of an executed bond purchase contract or alternative documentation deemed sufficient by the commission to evidence the reasonable likelihood of the allocation distribution being fully used. Any portion of such allocation not so confirmed shall be added to the allocation of the commission on July 1. Prior to July 1, the commission shall provide written notice of the allocation decrease to the affected issuing authority. The reallocation shall not limit the authority of the commission to assign a portion of its allocation pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(c) The commission may assign a portion of its allocation to another issuing agency.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2069; 1995 c 399 s 99; 1986 c 264 s 3; 1985 c 6 s 15; 1984 c 28 s 1; 1983 c 161 s 20.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.